pt-PT: Itens incluídos no kit de recolha de insetos: Aspirador (pooter); Pincel; Rede para apanhar insetos; Guia/folheto de identificação de insetos; Visualizador/recipiente de observação de insetos; Caixa de transporte; Frascos de recolha; Caderno de campo; Lanterna/lanterna de cabeça; Cartões de identificação/observação; Tabuleiro de separação de insetos; Folheto de instruções; Lupa; Régua/fita métrica; Frascos/recipientes para espécimes; Autocolantes/etiquetas; Habitat temporário/terrário de insetos; Pinça/fórceps; Tampa(s) ventilada(s); Outro
sk-SK: Vrátane položiek sady na zbieranie chrobákov: Odsávač; Štetec; Sieťka na chytanie hmyzu; Sprievodca/brožúra na identifikáciu hmyzu; Nádoba na pozorovanie hmyzu; Kufrík na prenášanie; Zberné fľaštičky; Poľný zápisník; Baterka/čelovka; Identifikačné/pozorovacie karty; Miska na triedenie hmyzu; Návod; Lupa; Pravítko/meracie pásmo; Poháre/nádoby na vzorky; Nálepky/štítky; Dočasné bydlisko pre hmyz/terárium; Pinzeta/kliešte; Vetrané veká; Iné
nb: Inkluderte gjenstander i insektsamlesett: Aspirator (insektsuger); Børste; Insektnett; Guide/hefte for identifisering av insekter; Insektglass/observasjonsbeholder; Bæreveske; Samleglass; Feltdagbok; Lommelykt/hodelykt; ID-/observasjonskort; Sorteringsbrett for insekter; Instruksjonshefte; Forstørrelsesglass; Linjal/målebånd; Prøveglass/beholdere; Klistremerker/etiketter; Midlertidig insekthabitat/terrarium; Pinsett; Ventilert lokk; Annet
bg-BG: Включени елементи в комплекта за събиране на насекоми: Аспиратор (путер); Четка; Мрежа за хващане на насекоми; Ръководство/книжка за разпознаване на насекоми; Контейнер за наблюдение на насекоми; Кутия за носене; Стъкленици за събиране; Полеви бележник; Фенерче/челник; Карти за идентификация/наблюдение; Табличка за сортиране на насекоми; Книжка с инструкции; Лупа; Линийка/ролетка; Бурканчета/контейнери за образци; Стикери/етикети; Временно местообитание/терариум за насекоми; Пинсети/форцепс; Вентилиран(и) капак/капаци; Друго
fr: Articles inclus dans le kit de collecte d'insectes: Aspirateur à insectes; Pinceau; Filet à insectes; Guide/livret d’identification d’insectes; Récipient d’observation d’insectes; Étui de transport; Flacons de collecte; Carnet de terrain; Lampe de poche/frontale; Cartes d’identification/d’observation; Plateau de tri d’insectes; Livret d’instructions; Loupe; Règle/ruban à mesurer; Bocaux/récipients pour spécimens; Autocollants/étiquettes; Habitat temporaire pour insectes/terrarium; Pinces/forceps; Couvercle(s) ventilé(s); Autre
zh-TW: 包含昆蟲採集套組品項: 吸蟲器 (pooter); 刷子; 捕蟲網; 昆蟲鑑定指南/手冊; 昆蟲觀察盒; 攜帶盒; 採集小瓶; 野外筆記本; 手電筒/頭燈; 鑑定/觀察卡; 昆蟲分類托盤; 說明手冊; 放大鏡; 尺/捲尺; 標本罐/容器; 貼紙/標籤; 臨時昆蟲棲息地/飼養箱; 鑷子/夾子; 通風蓋; 其他
it: Articoli inclusi nel kit di raccolta insetti: Aspiratore (pooter); Pennello; Retino acchiappainsetti; Guida/libretto di identificazione degli insetti; Contenitore di osservazione/visualizzazione insetti; Custodia per il trasporto; Fiale di raccolta; Taccuino da campo; Torcia/lampada frontale; Schede di identificazione/osservazione; Vassoio di smistamento insetti; Libretto di istruzioni; Lente d'ingrandimento; Righello/metro a nastro; Barattoli/contenitori per campioni; Adesivi/etichette; Habitat/terrario temporaneo per insetti; Pinzette/pinze; Coperchio/i ventilato/i; Altro
en: Bug collecting kit items included: Aspirator (pooter); Brush; Bug catching net; Bug identification guide/booklet; Bug viewer/observation container; Carrying case; Collection vials; Field notebook; Flashlight/headlamp; ID/observation cards; Insect sorting tray; Instruction booklet; Magnifying glass; Ruler/measuring tape; Specimen jars/containers; Stickers/labels; Temporary insect habitat/terrarium; Tweezers/forceps; Ventilated lid(s); Other
hr-HR: Uključeni proizvodi opreme za skupljanje insekata: Aspirator (pooter); Kist; Mrežica za hvatanje buba; Vodič/knjižica za prepoznavanje buba; Posuda za promatranje buba; Kutija za nošenje; Bočice za skupljanje; Terenska bilježnica; Svjetiljka/naglavna svjetiljka; Kartice za identifikaciju/promatranje; Pladanj za razvrstavanje insekata; Knjižica s uputama; Povećalo; Ravnalo/mjerna traka; Staklenke/posude za uzorke; Naljepnice/oznake; Privremeno stanište za insekte / terarij; Pinceta; Ventilirani poklopac (poklopci); Ostalo
de: Im Set enthaltene Artikel: Insektensauger (Exhaustor); Pinsel; Insektennetz; Insektenbestimmungsbuch/-broschüre; Insektenbetrachter/Beobachtungsbehälter; Tragekoffer; Sammelröhrchen; Feldnotizbuch; Taschenlampe/Stirnlampe; Bestimmungs-/Beobachtungskarten; Insektensortierschale; Anleitungsbroschüre; Lupe; Lineal/Maßband; Probengefäße/-behälter; Aufkleber/Sticker; Temporäres Insektenhabitat/Terrarium; Pinzette; Belüfteter Deckel; Sonstiges
th: อุปกรณ์ที่รวมมาในชุดเก็บแมลง: เครื่องดูดแมลง (Pooter); แปรง; ตาข่ายจับแมลง; คู่มือ/แผ่นพับระบุชนิดแมลง; กล่องดู/สังเกตแมลง; กล่องพกพา; ขวดเก็บตัวอย่าง; สมุดจดบันทึกภาคสนาม; ไฟฉาย/ไฟฉายคาดหัว; การ์ดระบุชนิด/สังเกตการณ์; ถาดคัดแยกแมลง; หนังสือคู่มือ; แว่นขยาย; ไม้บรรทัด/สายวัด; โหล/ภาชนะเก็บตัวอย่าง; สติกเกอร์/ป้าย; ที่อยู่อาศัยจำลองชั่วคราว/ตู้เลี้ยงแมลง; แหนบ/คีมคีบ; ฝาปิดระบายอากาศ; อื่นๆ
cs: Položky sady na sbírání hmyzu: Exhaustor; Štětec; Síťka na chytání hmyzu; Průvodce/brožura k určování hmyzu; Nádoba na prohlížení/pozorování hmyzu; Přenosné pouzdro; Sběrné lahvičky; Polní zápisník; Svítilna/čelovka; Určovací/pozorovací karty; Třídicí miska na hmyz; Návod k použití; Lupa; Pravítko / svinovací metr; Nádoby/sklenice na vzorky; Nálepky/štítky; Dočasné prostředí pro hmyz / terárium; Pinzeta/kleště; Odvětrávaná víka; Jiné
ko: 곤충 채집 키트 포함 품목: 흡충관(푸터); 브러시; 벌레 채집망; 벌레 식별 가이드/책자; 벌레 관찰기/관찰 용기; 휴대용 케이스; 채집용 바이알; 야외 노트; 손전등/헤드램프; 식별/관찰 카드; 곤충 분류 트레이; 사용 설명서; 돋보기; 자/줄자; 표본 병/용기; 스티커/라벨; 임시 곤충 서식지/테라리움; 핀셋/포셉; 통풍 덮개; 기타
fi: Ötököiden keräilypakkauksen mukana tulevat tarvikkeet: Imejä (pooter); Harja; Hyönteisverkko; Hyönteisten tunnistusopas/vihko; Hyönteisten tarkkailurasia/-astia; Kantolaukku; Keräyspullot; Maastomuistikirja; Taskulamppu/otsalamppu; Tunnistus-/havaintokortit; Hyönteisten lajittelualusta; Ohjekirja; Suurennuslasi; Viivain/mittanauha; Näytepurkit/-astiat; Tarrat/etiketit; Väliaikainen hyönteisasumus/terraario; Pinsetit/pihdit; Ilmastoidut kannet; Muu
zh-CN: 包含昆虫采集套装物品: 吸虫管; 刷子; 捕虫网; 昆虫图鉴/手册; 昆虫观察盒; 便携包; 收集瓶; 野外笔记本; 手电筒/头灯; 识别/观察卡; 昆虫分类盘; 说明手册; 放大镜; 尺子/卷尺; 标本罐/容器; 贴纸/标签; 临时昆虫饲养箱/玻璃箱; 镊子/夹子; 通风盖; 其他
pt-BR: Itens incluídos no kit para coleta de insetos: Aspirador (sugador de insetos); Pincel; Rede para pegar insetos; Guia/livreto de identificação de insetos; Visualizador de insetos/recipiente de observação; Estojo de transporte; Frascos de coleta; Caderno de campo; Lanterna/lanterna de cabeça; Cartões de identificação/observação; Bandeja de triagem de insetos; Livreto de instruções; Lupa; Régua/fita métrica; Potes/recipientes de espécimes; Adesivos/etiquetas; Habitat temporário de insetos/terrário; Pinças; Tampa(s) ventilada(s); Outros
pl: Dołączono elementy zestawu do zbierania owadów: Aspirator entomologiczny; Pędzelek; Siatka na owady; Przewodnik/książeczka do identyfikacji owadów; Pojemnik do obserwacji owadów; Etui do przenoszenia; Fiolki do kolekcji; Notatnik terenowy; Latarka/czołówka; Karty identyfikacyjne/obserwacyjne; Tacka do sortowania owadów; Instrukcja; Szkło powiększające; Linijka / taśma miernicza; Słoiki/pojemniki na okazy; Naklejki/etykiety; Tymczasowe siedlisko dla owadów / terrarium; Pinceta/szczypce; Wentylowane pokrywki; Inne
hu: Rovargyűjtő készlet tartalma: Rovar-szippantó; Ecset; Rovarháló; Rovarhatározó/útmutató; Rovarmegfigyelő doboz; Hordozótáska; Gyűjtőfiolák; Terepnapló; Zseblámpa/fejlámpa; Határozó-/megfigyelőkártyák; Rovarválogató tálca; Használati útmutató; Nagyító; Vonalzó/mérőszalag; Mintatartó üvegek/dobozok; Matricák/címkék; Ideiglenes rovarélőhely/terrárium; Csipesz; Szellőző fedél(ek); Egyéb
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys vabalų rinkimo rinkinio elementai: Aspiratorius (siurbtukas); Šepetėlis; Tinklelis vabzdžiams gaudyti; Vabzdžių atpažinimo vadovas / knygelė; Vabzdžių stebėjimo indas; Nešiojimo dėklas; Surinkimo buteliukai; Užrašų knygelė; Žibintuvėlis / galvos žibintas; Atpažinimo / stebėjimo kortelės; Vabzdžių rūšiavimo padėklas; Instrukcijų knygelė; Didinamasis stiklas; Liniuotė / matavimo juosta; Indeliai mėginiams; Lipdukai / etiketės; Laikina vabzdžių buveinė / terariumas; Pincetas / žnyplės; Vėdinamas dangtelis (-iai); Kita
ru: Состав набора для сбора насекомых: Аспиратор (эксгаустер); Кисточка; Сачок для насекомых; Определитель насекомых/буклет; Контейнер для наблюдения за насекомыми; Сумка для переноски; Колбы для сбора; Полевой дневник; Фонарик/налобный фонарь; Карточки для идентификации/наблюдения; Лоток для сортировки насекомых; Буклет с инструкциями; Лупа; Линейка/рулетка; Банки/контейнеры для образцов; Наклейки/этикетки; Временная среда обитания/террариум; Пинцет/щипцы; Вентилируемые крышки; Другое
da: Medfølgende dele i insektindsamlingssæt: Insektsuger; Pensel; Insektnet; Insektguide/-hæfte; Insektglas/observationsbeholder; Bæretaske; Indsamlingsglas; Feltnotesbog; Lommelygte/pandelampe; ID-/observationskort; Insektsorteringsbakke; Vejledningshæfte; Forstørrelsesglas; Lineal/målebånd; Prøveglas/beholdere; Klistermærker/etiketter; Midlertidigt insektbo/terrarium; Pincet/tang; Ventilerede låg; Andet
ro-RO: Articole incluse în kitul de colectare a insectelor: Aspirator (pooter); Pensulă; Plasă pentru prinderea insectelor; Ghid/broșură de identificare a insectelor; Vizualizator/Recipient de observare a insectelor; Geantă de transport; Fiole de colectare; Caiet de teren; Lanternă/Lanternă frontală; Carduri de identificare/observare; Tavă de sortare a insectelor; Broșură cu instrucțiuni; Lupă; Riglă/bandă de măsurare; Borcane/recipiente pentru specimene; Autocolante/etichete; Habitat temporar pentru insecte/Terariu; Pensetă/clește; Capac(e) ventilat(e); Altele
tr: Böcek toplama kitine dahil edilen parçalar: Aspiratör (böcek çekici); Fırça; Böcek yakalama ağı; Böcek tanıma rehberi/kitapçığı; Böcek izleme/gözlem kabı; Taşıma çantası; Toplama tüpleri; Arazi defteri; El feneri/kafa lambası; Kimlik/gözlem kartları; Böcek ayırma tepsisi; Kullanım kitapçığı; Büyüteç; Cetvel/mezura; Numune kavanozları/kapları; Çıkartmalar/etiketler; Geçici böcek habitatı/teraryumu; Cımbız/pens; Havalandırmalı kapak(lar); Diğer
es: Artículos del kit para coleccionar insectos incluidos: Aspirador (pooter); Pincel; Red para atrapar insectos; Guía/folleto de identificación de insectos; Contenedor de observación/visor de insectos; Estuche de transporte; Viales de recolección; Cuaderno de campo; Linterna/linterna frontal; Tarjetas de identificación/observación; Bandeja de clasificación de insectos; Folleto de instrucciones; Lupa; Regla/cinta métrica; Frascos/contenedores de especímenes; Pegatinas/etiquetas; Hábitat temporal de insectos/terrario; Pinzas/fórceps; Tapa(s) ventilada(s); Otro
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen insectenvangset: Zuigbuis (pooter); Penseel; Insectennet; Insecten-identificatiegids/-boekje; Insectenbekijker/observatiebakje; Draagtas; Verzamelbuisjes; Veldnotitieboekje; Zaklamp/hoofdlamp; Identificatie-/observatiekaarten; Sorteerbakje voor insecten; Instructieboekje; Vergrootglas; Liniaal/meetlint; Specimenpotjes/-bakjes; Stickers/labels; Tijdelijke insectenhabitat/terrarium; Pincet/tangetje; Geventileerde deksel(s); Overig
el: Περιλαμβάνεται κιτ προϊόντων συλλογής εντόμων: Αναρροφητήρας εντόμων; Πινέλο; Απόχη εντόμων; Οδηγός/φυλλάδιο αναγνώρισης εντόμων; Δοχείο προβολής/παρατήρησης εντόμων; Βαλιτσάκι μεταφοράς; Φιαλίδια συλλογής; Σημειωματάριο πεδίου; Φακός/φακός κεφαλής; Κάρτες αναγνώρισης/παρατήρησης; Δίσκος διαλογής εντόμων; Φυλλάδιο οδηγιών; Μεγεθυντικός φακός; Χάρακας/μεζούρα; Βάζα/δοχεία δειγμάτων; Αυτοκόλλητα/ετικέτες; Προσωρινός βιότοπος εντόμων/τεράριουμ; Τσιμπιδάκι/λαβίδα; Καπάκι(-α) με εξαερισμό; Άλλο
sv: Delar för insektsinsamling som ingår: Insektssug (exhaustor); Borste; Insektshåv; Identifieringsguide/-häfte för insekter; Insektslupp/observationsbehållare; Bärväska; Insamlingsrör; Fältanteckningsbok; Ficklampa/pannlampa; ID-/observationskort; Sorteringsbricka för insekter; Instruktionshäfte; Förstoringsglas; Linjal/måttband; Provburkar/-behållare; Klistermärken/etiketter; Tillfälligt insektshabitat/terrarium; Pincett; Ventilerade lock; Övrigt
ja: 昆虫採集キットアイテム付き: 吸虫管; ブラシ; 捕虫網; 昆虫識別ガイド/小冊子; 昆虫観察容器; キャリングケース; 採集用バイアル; フィールドノート; 懐中電灯/ヘッドランプ; 識別/観察カード; 昆虫分類トレイ; 取扱説明書; 虫眼鏡; 定規/メジャー; 標本瓶/容器; ステッカー/ラベル; 一時的な昆虫生息地/テラリウム; ピンセット/トング; 通気口付き蓋; その他
vi: Các dụng cụ đi kèm của bộ bắt/thu thập côn trùng: Máy hút (pooter); Cọ; Vợt bắt bọ; Sổ/hướng dẫn nhận diện bọ; Hộp quan sát/xem bọ; Hộp đựng; Lọ thu thập; Sổ ghi chép thực địa; Đèn pin/đèn đội đầu; Thẻ ID/quan sát; Khay phân loại côn trùng; Cuốn hướng dẫn; Kính lúp; Thước kẻ/thước cuộn; Bình/hộp đựng mẫu vật; Nhãn dán/nhãn; Môi trường sống tạm thời cho côn trùng/chuồng kính; Nhíp/kẹp; Nắp có lỗ thông hơi; Khác
sl-SI: Priloženi izdelki kompleta za zbiranje žuželk: Aspirator (lovilec); Čopič; Mreža za lovljenje žuželk; Vodnik/knjižica za prepoznavanje žuželk; Posoda za opazovanje žuželk; Etui za prenašanje; Zbirne epruvete; Terenska beležnica; Svetilka / naglavna svetilka; Identifikacijske/opazovalne kartice; Pladenj za sortiranje žuželk; Knjižica z navodili; Povečevalno steklo; Ravnilo / merilni trak; Posode / lončki za vzorce; Nalepke/oznake; Začasni habitat / terarij za žuželke; Pinceta; Pokrov z zračniki; Drugo